GRAMMARS/GERMAN/FST/src/XMORPH/flex-verb.lexc
LEXICON V.tun
  tun+Verb:tun			vform/Inf;
  tun+Verb:tuend		vform/PPres;
  tun+Verb:tu			vflex/ImpSg;
  tun+Verb:tut			vform/ImpPl;
  tun+Verb:tu			vform/1SgPresInd;
  tun+Verb:tue			vform/13SgPresKonj;
  tun+Verb:tust			vform/2SgPresInd;
  tun+Verb:tuest		vform/2SgPresKonj;
  tun+Verb:tut			vform/3SgPresInd;
  tun+Verb:tun			vform/13PlPres;
  tun+Verb:tut			vform/2PlPres;
  tun+Verb:tat			vflex/PastIndStr;
  tun+Verb:tät			vflex/PastKonjStr;
  tun+Verb:tan			vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.verderben
  verderben+Verb:verderben	vflex/PresIrreg;
  verderben+Verb:verdirb	vflex/Pres2;
  verderben+Verb:verdirb	vform/ImpSg;
  verderben+Verb:verdarb	vflex/PastIndStr;
  verderben+Verb:verdürb	vflex/PastKonjStr;
  verderben+Verb:verdorben	vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.verdrießen
  verdrießen+Verb:verdrießen	vflex/PresReg;
  verdrießen+Verb:verdross	vflex/PastIndStr;
  verdrießen+Verb:verdröss	vflex/PastKonjStr;
  verdrießen+Verb:verdrossen	vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.vergessen
  vergessen+Verb:vergessen	vflex/PresIrreg;
  vergessen+Verb:vergiss	vflex/Pres2;
  vergessen+Verb:vergiss	vform/ImpSg;
  vergessen+Verb:vergaß		vflex/PastIndStr;
  vergessen+Verb:vergäß		vflex/PastKonjStr;
  vergessen+Verb:vergessen	vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.verlieren
  verlieren+Verb:verlieren	vflex/PresReg;
  verlieren+Verb:verlor		vflex/PastIndStr;
  verlieren+Verb:verlör		vflex/PastKonjStr;
  verlieren+Verb:verloren	vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.wachsen
  wachsen+Verb:wachsen		vflex/PresIrreg;
  wachsen+Verb:wachs		vflex/ImpSg;
  wachsen+Verb:wächs		vflex/Pres2;
  wachsen+Verb:wuchs		vflex/PastIndStr;
  wachsen+Verb:wüchs		vflex/PastKonjStr;
  wachsen+Verb:wachsen		vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.wägen
  wägen+Verb:wägen		vflex/PresReg;
  wägen+Verb:wog		vflex/PastIndStr;
  wägen+Verb:wög		vflex/PastKonjStr;
  wägen+Verb:wogen		vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.waschen
  waschen+Verb:waschen		vflex/PresIrreg;
  waschen+Verb:wasch		vflex/ImpSg;
  waschen+Verb:wäsch		vflex/Pres2;
  waschen+Verb:wusch		vflex/PastIndStr;
  waschen+Verb:wüsch		vflex/PastKonjStr;
  waschen+Verb:waschen		vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.weben
  weben+Verb			V_reg ;
  weben+Verb:wob		vflex/PastIndStr;
  weben+Verb:wöb		vflex/PastKonjStr;
  weben+Verb:woben		vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.weichen
  weichen+Verb:weichen		vflex/PresReg;
  weichen+Verb:wich		vflex/PastStr;
  weichen+Verb:wichen		vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.wenden
  wenden+Verb			V_reg ;
  wenden+Verb:wand^*		vflex/PastReg;
  wenden+Verb:wandt		vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.weisen
  weisen+Verb:weisen		vflex/PresReg;
  weisen+Verb:wies		vflex/PastStr;
  weisen+Verb:wiesen		vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.werben
  werben+Verb:werben		vflex/PresIrreg;
  werben+Verb:wirb		vflex/Pres2;
  werben+Verb:wirb		vform/ImpSg;
  werben+Verb:warb		vflex/PastIndStr;
  werben+Verb:würb		vflex/PastKonjStr;
  werben+Verb:worben		vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.werfen
  werfen+Verb:werfen		vflex/PresIrreg;
  werfen+Verb:wirf		vflex/Pres2;
  werfen+Verb:wirf		vform/ImpSg;
  werfen+Verb:warf		vflex/PastIndStr;
  werfen+Verb:würf		vflex/PastKonjStr;
  werfen+Verb:worfen		vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.wiegen
  wiegen+Verb:wiegen		vflex/PresReg;
  wiegen+Verb:wog		vflex/PastIndStr;
  wiegen+Verb:wög		vflex/PastKonjStr;
  wiegen+Verb:wogen		vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.winden
  winden+Verb:winden		vflex/PresReg;
  winden+Verb:wand		vflex/PastIndStr;
  winden+Verb:wänd		vflex/PastKonjStr;
  winden+Verb:wunden		vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.wissen
  wissen+Verb:wissen		vflex/ModInf;
  wissen+Verb:weiß		vflex/ModSg;
  wissen+Verb:wuss		vflex/PastIndReg;
  wissen+Verb:wüss		vflex/PastKonjReg;
  wissen+Verb:wusst		vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.wringen
  wringen+Verb:wringen		vflex/PresReg;
  wringen+Verb:wrang		vflex/PastIndStr;
  wringen+Verb:wräng		vflex/PastKonjStr;
  wringen+Verb:wrungen		vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.zeihen
  zeihen+Verb:zeihen		vflex/PresReg;
  zeihen+Verb:zieh		vflex/PastStr;
  zeihen+Verb:ziehen		vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.ziehen
  ziehen+Verb:ziehen		vflex/PresReg;
  ziehen+Verb:zog		vflex/PastIndStr;
  ziehen+Verb:zög		vflex/PastKonjStr;
  ziehen+Verb:zogen		vform/PPast;

LEXICON V.zwingen
  zwingen+Verb:zwingen		vflex/PresReg;
  zwingen+Verb:zwang		vflex/PastIndStr;
  zwingen+Verb:zwäng		vflex/PastKonjStr;
  zwingen+Verb:zwungen		vform/PPast;
